District of Columbia statutes.
1-805.03

Transfer of and access to records of District Government.

(a)

In general. —

Within 30 days after the Secretary or the Trustee requests, the District Government shall furnish copies of all records, documents, information, or data the Secretary or the Trustee deems necessary to carry out responsibilities under this chapter and the contract. Upon request, the District Government shall grant the Secretary or the Trustee direct access to such information systems, records, documents, information or data as the Secretary or Trustee requires to carry out responsibilities under this chapter or the contract.

(b)

Repayment by District Government. —

The District Government shall reimburse the Trust Fund for all costs, including benefit costs, that are attributable to errors or omissions in the transferred records that are identified within 3 years after such records are transferred.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 721, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11023
This section is referenced in § 1-817.06 and § 1-821.01.
1981 Ed., § 1-763.3.